Missouri, session 2026, HCR33.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 4, passed by the One Hundredth
General Assembly, First Regular Session, designated the Kansas City Chiefs as the official
professional football team of the state of Missouri; and

WHEREAS, the Kansas City Chiefs have publicly announced their intent to relocate
all operations to the state of Kansas:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby repeal Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 4 from the One
Hundredth General Assembly, First Regular Session, and no longer recognize the Kansas City
Chiefs as the official professional football team of the state of Missouri; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the Chief Clerk of the Missouri House of
Representatives be instructed to prepare a properly inscribed copy of this resolution for the
Governor for his approval or rejection pursuant to the Constitution of Missouri.
✔